Arkansas, session 2025, SB433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 1-4-133 is amended to read as follows:
1-4-133. Display of national motto — Display of the Ten Commandments.
(a)(1) If funds under subsection (b) of this section are available,
local school superintendents, local government building administrators, or
chief administrators of the public schools in this state, or institutions of
higher education, or their respective designees, and the administrative
officials of state agencies, or their respective designees, shall prominently
display the following in a conspicuous place in a location described in
subdivision (a)(2) of this section a durable poster or framed copy
containing:
(A)(i) The A durable poster or framed copy of the national
motto of the United States, “In God We Trust”.
(ii) The national motto shall:
(a) Be easily readable on a poster or framed
copy of at least eleven inches by fourteen inches (11″ x 14″);
(b) Be the central focus of the poster or
framed copy; and.
(c) Be displayed in a large font size;.
*TNL025*
03-17-2025 16:47:43 TNL025

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB433
(iii) The durable poster or framed copy required
under subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) of this section shall include:
(B)(a) An accurate representation of the
United States flag, which shall be under the national motto; and
(C)(b) An accurate representation of the
Arkansas state flag or flags; and
(B)(i) A durable poster or framed copy of a historical
representation of the Ten Commandments.
(ii) The durable poster or framed copy of a
historical representation of the Ten Commandments required by subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall:
(a) Include the text of the Ten Commandments
in a size and typeface that is legible to a person with average vision from
anywhere in the room in which the durable poster or framed copy is displayed;
and
(b) Be at least sixteen inches by twenty
inches (16" x 20").
(iii) The text of the durable poster or framed copy
of the Ten Commandments shall read as follows:
"The Ten Commandments
I am the Lord thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land
which the Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his
maidservant, nor his cattle, nor anything that is thy neighbor's.".
(2) The durable posters or framed copies donated or purchased
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be displayed in each:
03-17-2025 16:47:43 TNL025

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB433
(A) Public institution of higher education and elementary
and secondary school library and classroom in this state; and
(B) Public building or facility in this state that is
maintained or operated by taxpayer funds.
(b) The copies or posters authorized under this section shall either
be donated or shall be purchased solely with funds made available through
voluntary contributions to the local school boards, local building governing
entity, or the Building Authority Division.
(c) If a copy or poster required under this section does not meet the
requirements of subsection (a) of this section, then an institution specified
under subsection (a) of this section may replace the copy or poster with a
copy or poster that meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section:
(1) With public funds; or
(2) By accepting a private donation.
(d) If an institution specified under subsection (a) of this section
has a copy or poster that is not needed for display, then the institution
specified under subsection (a) of this section shall donate the copy or
poster to another institution specified under subsection (a) of this section.

/s/J. Dotson
















03-17-2025 16:47:43 TNL025